District of Columbia statutes.
47-2424

Unfair cigarette sales.

For the purposes of this chapter, cigarettes imported or reimported into the United States for sale or distribution under a trade name, trade dress, or trademark that is the same as, or is confusingly similar to, a trade name, trade dress, or trademark used for cigarettes manufactured in the United States for sale or distribution in the United States shall be presumed to have been purchased outside of the ordinary channels of trade.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-225, § 2(c), 48 DCR 35
June 19, 2001, D.C. Law 13-313, § 16(c)(5), 48 DCR 1873
D.C. Law 13-313 inserted the section symbol in the section heading.